Washington statutes.
RCW 15.54.412

Misbranding.

No person may distribute misbranded commercial fertilizer. A commercial fertilizer shall be deemed to be misbranded:

(1) If its labeling bears any statement, design, or graphic representation relative thereto or to its ingredients which is false or misleading in any particular;

(2) If it is distributed under the name of another fertilizer product;

(3) If its labeling bears any reference to registration under this chapter unless such reference is required by rule under this chapter;

(4) If any word, statement, or other information, required by this chapter or rules adopted thereunder to appear on the label or labeling, is not prominently placed thereon with such conspicuousness (as compared with other words, statements, design, or graphic matter in the labeling), and in such terms as to render it likely to be read and understood by the ordinary individual under customary conditions of purchase and use; or

(5) If it purports to be or is represented as a fertilizer, or is represented as containing a plant nutrient or fertilizer unless such plant nutrient or fertilizer conforms to the definition of identity, if any, prescribed by the department by rule. In adopting such rules the department shall give due regard to commonly accepted definitions and official fertilizer terms such as those issued by the association of American plant food control officials.

[ 1987 c 45 s 20.]

NOTES:

Construction—Severability—1987 c 45: See notes following RCW 15.54.270.